02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%{m%}
%<der_kue%>
%<comp%>
%<pl%>
%{g%}
%{n%}
%<nom%>
%{s%}
%<num%>
%{d%}

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
DIGITLEX ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PL ;  
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-SPA

:%{s%} N ; 

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON PL

CASE ;
%<pl%>:%>%{n%}%{g%}uéra CASE ;

LEXICON CASE

%<gen%>:%>gui # ; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"
%<comp%>:%>icha # ; !
%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>:%- CASE ;

LEXICON LOOP

LAST-DIGIT ;
DIGITLEX ;

LEXICON LAST-DIGIT

1:1%{d%} NUM-DIGIT ; !"peteĩ"
2:2 NUM-DIGIT ; !"mokõi"
3:3 NUM-DIGIT ; !"mbohapy"
4:4 NUM-DIGIT ; !"irundy"
5:5 NUM-DIGIT ; !"po"
6:6%{d%} NUM-DIGIT ; !"poteĩ"
7:7 NUM-DIGIT ; !"pokõi"
8:8 NUM-DIGIT ; !"poapy"
9:9 NUM-DIGIT ; !"porundy"

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;
LAST-DIGIT;

LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
asociación:asociación N-SPA ;
declaración:declaración N-SPA ;
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
tembiasakue:tembiasakue N ; ! "historia"
akãvai:akãvai N ; ! "locura"
ja:ja N ; ! "ocasion"
jagua:jagua N ; ! "perro"
